csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_CNJ_TI4.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziwaan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziwan
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziwaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziwang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziweg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanzig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanzigwaa
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanzinig
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO/0PlO: ayaaman
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO/0PlO: ayaamaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaamang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaameg
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO/0PlO: ayaang
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaamowaad
     ayaan+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: ayaaminid
